Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,233
Forcible entry and detainer; appeal; procedure.

Any party against whom judgment has been entered in an action of forcible entry and detention, or forcible detention only, of real property, may appeal as provided for in a civil action.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 131, p. 312;

C.S.1929, § 22-1215;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,132;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 82;

Laws 1981, LB 42, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-582;

Laws 2004, LB 1207, § 13.

In an action for forcible entry and detainer, the plain language of this section does not allow an immediate appeal of an order of restitution when the order implicates section 25-1315, meaning the order adjudicates fewer than all claims for relief or the rights and liabilities of fewer than all the parties, without being certified pursuant to section 25-1315(1). TDP Phase One v. The Club at the Yard, 307 Neb. 795, 950 N.W.2d 640 (2020).